Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 1 GENERAL AND ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS
Requiring qualifying retail utilities to adopt procedures designed to ensure that, for all renewable distributed generation or storage facilities included in their net metering service:

The size of any off-site, single-meter installation does not exceed five hundred kilowatts;

The size of any off-site, multi-meter installation does not exceed three hundred kilowatts per meter; and

For any off-site facility exceeding three hundred kilowatts, the installation and any necessary repair or maintenance work is performed by a licensed master electrician, licensed journeyman electrician, or licensed residential wireman or by properly supervised apprentices, in addition to complying with all applicable interconnection rules.

(1.5) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, subsections (1)(e) and (1)(j) of this section do not apply to a municipally owned utility or to a cooperative electric association.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 257, § 1, effective March 27, 2007.)

Each municipally owned electric utility that is a qualifying retail utility shall implement a renewable energy standard substantially similar to this section. The municipally owned utility shall submit a statement to the commission that demonstrates such municipal utility has a substantially similar renewable energy standard. The statement submitted by the municipally owned utility is for informational purposes and is not subject to approval by the commission. Upon filing of the certification statement, the municipally owned utility shall have no further obligations under subsection (1) of this section. The renewable energy standard of a municipally owned utility shall, at a minimum, meet the following criteria:

The eligible energy resources shall be limited to those identified in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section;

The percentage requirements shall be equal to or greater in the same years than those identified in subparagraph (V) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, counted in the manner allowed by said paragraph (c); and

The utility must have an optional pricing program in effect that allows retail customers the option to support through utility rates emerging renewable energy technologies.

For municipal utilities that become qualifying retail utilities after December 31, 2006, the percentage requirements identified in subparagraph (V) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section shall begin in the first calendar year following qualification as follows:

Years one through three: One percent of retail electricity sales;

Years four through seven: Three percent of retail electricity sales;

Years eight through twelve: Six percent of retail electricity sales; and

Years thirteen and thereafter: Ten percent of retail electricity sales.

Procedure for exemption and inclusion - election.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 257, § 1, effective March 27, 2007.)

The board of directors of each municipally owned electric utility not subject to this section may, at its option, submit the question of its inclusion in this section to its consumers on a one meter equals one vote basis. Approval by a majority of those voting in the election shall be required for such inclusion, providing that a minimum of twenty-five percent of eligible consumers participates in the election.

(5.5) Each cooperative electric association that is a qualifying retail utility shall submit an annual compliance report to the commission no later than June 1 of each year in which the cooperative electric association is subject to the renewable energy standard requirements established in this section. The annual compliance report shall describe the steps taken by the cooperative electric association to comply with the renewable energy standards and shall include the same information set forth in the rules of the commission for jurisdictional utilities. Cooperative electric associations shall not be subject to any part of the compliance report review process as provided in the rules for jurisdictional utilities. Cooperative electric associations shall not be required to obtain commission approval of annual compliance reports, and no additional regulatory authority of the commission other than that specifically contained in this subsection (5.5) is created or implied by this subsection (5.5).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 257, § 1, effective March 27, 2007.)

Definitions. For purposes of this subsection (7), unless the context otherwise requires:

"Customer-generator" means an end-use electricity customer that generates electricity on the customer's side of the meter using eligible energy resources.

"Municipally owned utility" means a municipally owned utility that serves five thousand customers or more.

Each municipally owned utility shall allow a customer-generator's retail electricity consumption to be offset by the electricity generated from eligible energy resources on the customer-generator's side of the meter that are interconnected with the facilities of the municipally owned utility, subject to the following:

Monthly excess generation. If a customer-generator generates electricity in excess of the customer-generator's monthly consumption, all such excess energy, expressed in kilowatt-hours, shall be carried forward from month to month and credited at a ratio of one to one against the customer-generator's energy consumption, expressed in kilowatt-hours, in subsequent months.

Annual excess generation. Within sixty days after the end of each annual period, or within sixty days after the customer-generator terminates its retail service, the municipally owned utility shall account for any excess energy generation, expressed in kilowatt-hours, accrued by the customer-generator and shall credit such excess generation to the customer-generator in a manner deemed appropriate by the municipally owned utility.

Nondiscriminatory rates. A municipally owned utility shall provide net metering service at nondiscriminatory rates.

Interconnection standards. Each municipally owned utility shall adopt and post small generation interconnection standards and insurance requirements that are functionally similar to those established in the rules promulgated by the public utilities commission pursuant to this section; except that the municipally owned utility may reduce or waive any of the insurance requirements. If any customer-generator subject to the size specifications specified in subparagraph (V) of this paragraph (b) is denied interconnection by the municipally owned utility, the utility shall provide a written technical or economic explanation of such denial to the customer.

Size specifications. Each municipally owned utility may allow customer-generators to generate electricity subject to net metering in amounts in excess of those specified in this subparagraph (V), and shall allow:

Residential customer-generators to generate electricity subject to net metering up to ten kilowatts; and

Commercial or industrial customer-generators to generate electricity subject to net metering up to twenty-five kilowatts.

Qualifying wholesale utilities - definition - electric resource standard - tradable credits - reports.

Definition. Each generation and transmission cooperative electric association that provides wholesale electric service directly to Colorado electric associations that are its members is a qualifying wholesale utility. Commission rules adopted under subsections (1) to (7) of this section do not apply directly to qualifying wholesale utilities, and this subsection (8) does not provide the commission with additional regulatory authority over qualifying wholesale utilities.

Electric resource standard. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each qualifying wholesale utility shall generate, or cause to be generated, at least twenty percent of the energy it provides to its Colorado members at wholesale from eligible energy resources in the year 2020 and thereafter. If, and to the extent that, the purchase of energy generated from eligible energy resources by a Colorado member from a qualifying wholesale utility would cause an increase in rates for the Colorado member that exceeds the retail rate impact limitation in sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (g) of subsection (1) of this section, the obligation imposed on the qualifying wholesale utility is reduced by the amount of such energy necessary to enable the Colorado member to comply with the rate impact limitation.

A qualifying wholesale utility may count the energy generated or caused to be generated from eligible energy resources by its Colorado members or by the qualifying wholesale utility on behalf of its Colorado members pursuant to subparagraph (V) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section toward compliance with the energy resource standard established in this subsection (8).

Preferences for certain eligible energy resources and the limit on their applicability established in subparagraph (VIII) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section may be used by a qualifying wholesale utility in meeting the energy resource standard established in this subsection (8).

Tradable renewable energy credits. A qualifying wholesale utility shall use a system of tradable renewable energy credits to comply with the electric resource standard established in this subsection (8); except that a renewable energy credit acquired under this subsection (8) expires at the end of the fifth calendar year following the calendar year in which it was generated.

In implementing the electric resource standard established in this subsection (8), a qualifying wholesale utility shall assure that the costs, both direct and indirect, attributable to compliance with the standard are recovered from its Colorado members. The qualifying wholesale utility shall employ such cost allocation methods as are required to assure that any direct or indirect costs attributable to compliance with the standard established in this subsection (8) do not affect the cost or price of the qualifying wholesale utility's sales to customers outside of Colorado.

Reports. Each qualifying wholesale utility shall submit an annual report to the commission no later than June 1, 2014, and June 1 of each year thereafter. In addition, the qualifying wholesale utility shall post an electronic copy of each report on its website and shall provide the commission with an electronic copy of the report. In each report, the qualifying wholesale utility shall:

Describe the steps it took during the immediately preceding twelve months to comply with the electric resource standard established in this subsection (8);

In the years before 2020, describe whether it is making sufficient progress toward meeting the standard in 2020 or is likely to meet the 2020 standard early. If it is not making sufficient progress toward meeting the standard in 2020, it shall explain why and shall indicate the steps it intends to take to increase the pace of progress; and

In 2020 and thereafter, describe whether it has achieved compliance with the electric resource standard established in this subsection (8) and whether it anticipates continuing to do so. If it has not achieved such compliance or does not anticipate continuing to do so, it shall explain why and shall indicate the steps it intends to take to meet the standard and by what date.

Nothing in this subsection (8) amends or waives any provision of subsections (1) to (7) of this section.

Source: Initiated 2004:

Entire section added, see L. 2005, p. 2337, effective December 1, 2004, proclamation of the Governor issued December 1, 2004.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 234, § 1, effective August 8; (6) added by revision, see L. 2005, p. 2340, § 3.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 257, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 2008:

(7) added, p. 190, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1)(c)(II), (1)(e), and (1)(f)(V) amended and (1.5) added, (SB 09-051), ch. 157, p. 678, § 11, effective September 1.

L. 2010:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(c)(I), (1)(c)(II), (1)(c)(III), (1)(c)(IV), (1)(c)(VIII), (1)(e)(I), (1)(f)(IV), (1)(g)(I), (1)(g)(III), (1)(g)(IV), and (1)(i) amended and (1)(e)(I.5) and (1)(f)(VII) added, (HB 10-1001), ch. 37, pp. 144, 147, 148, §§ 1, 2, 3, effective August 11; (1)(c)(VI)(A) amended and (1)(c)(IX) added, (HB 10-1418), ch. 406, p. 2007, § 1, effective August 11; (1)(d) amended, (SB 10-177), ch. 392, p. 1864, § 7, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(c)(II)(A), (1)(c)(III), IP(1)(c)(V), IP(1)(c)(VI), (1)(c)(VII)(A), IP(1)(f), (1)(g)(I)(A), and (1)(g)(IV)(A) amended and (1)(c)(V.5), (1)(c)(X), and (8) added, (SB 13-252), ch. 414, p. 2452, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1)(c)(VII) amended, (SB 15-254), ch. 257, p. 934, § 1, effective May 29; (1)(c)(II)(A.5) added, (SB 15-046), ch. 142, p. 433, § 1, effective August 5; (1)(c)(II)(D) added, (HB 15-1377), ch. 200, p. 691, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

IP(1) amended and (1)(f)(I) repealed, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3291, § 4, effective May 30.

L. 2021:

(1)(d) amended and (1)(g)(I)(D) added, (SB 21-272), ch. 220, p. 1159, § 6, effective June 10; IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(IV), (1)(a)(VII), (1)(a)(VIII), (1)(c)(II)(B), IP(1)(e), (1)(e)(I), (1)(e)(II), (1)(e)(III), and (1.5) amended and (1)(a)(IV.5), (1)(a)(VII.5), (1)(e)(IV), and (1)(j) added, (SB 21-261), ch. 280, p. 1619, § 5, effective June 21; IP(1)(a) and (1)(a)(VI) amended, (HB 21-1052), ch. 52, p. 220, § 1, effective September 7.